Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.320

Deactivation of housing authority—Procedure.

A housing authority created under this chapter and activated by a resolution by the governing body of a city, town, or county may be deactivated by a resolution by the city, town, or county. The findings listed in RCW 35.82.030 to activate the housing authority shall be considered prior to deactivating the housing authority. For the sole purposes of winding up the affairs of a deactivated housing authority, the governing body of the city, town, or county may exercise any power granted to a housing authority under this chapter.

[ 1987 c 275 s 1.]